Illinois, session 104th, SB3076.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Employee Disability Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1 and 2 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 345/1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 91)7    Sec. 1. Disability benefit. 8    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "eligible employee" 9means any part-time or full-time State correctional officer or 10any other full or part-time employee of the Department of 11Corrections, any full or part-time employee of the Prisoner 12Review Board, any full or part-time employee of the Department 13of Human Services working within a penal institution or a 14State mental health or developmental disabilities facility 15operated by the Department of Human Services, any part-time or 16full-time county correctional officer or any other part-time 17or full-time employee of a county sheriff, and any full-time 18law enforcement officer or full-time firefighter, including a 19full-time paramedic or a firefighter who performs paramedic 20duties, who is employed by the State of Illinois, any unit of 21local government (including any home rule unit), any State 22supported college or university, or any other public entity 23granted the power to employ persons for such purposes by law.  SB3076 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1    (b) Whenever an eligible employee suffers any injury in 2the line of duty that which causes the employee him to be 3unable to perform the employee's his duties, the employee he 4shall continue to be paid by the employing public entity on the 5same basis as the employee he was paid before the injury, with 6no deduction from the employee's his sick leave credits, 7compensatory time for overtime accumulations or vacation, or 8service credits in a public employee pension fund during the 9time he is unable to perform his duties due to the result of 10the injury, but not longer than one year in relation to the 11same injury, except as otherwise provided under subsection 12(b-5). During the period in which the employee continues to be 13paid under this Section, the employing public entity shall 14also continue to provide the same options for health insurance 15benefits to the employee and, if applicable, to the employee's 16eligible dependents at the same benefit level as in effect 17immediately before the injury, and the employee shall pay no 18greater premium contribution rate than that which the employee 19was paying before the injury. Nothing in this Section shall 20diminish an employee's right to select health insurance 21coverage pursuant to the terms of an employee benefit plan or 22collective bargaining agreement. If the employee changes plans 23while receiving benefits pursuant to this Act, the employee 24shall pay the amount other employees pay for the same coverage 25pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or, in the 26absence of a collective bargaining agreement, what similarly   SB3076 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1situated employees pay pursuant to the employer's health 2insurance plan. However, no injury to an employee of the 3Department of Corrections or the Prisoner Review Board working 4within a penal institution or an employee of the Department of 5Human Services working within a departmental mental health or 6developmental disabilities facility shall qualify the employee 7for benefits under this Section unless the injury is the 8direct or indirect result of violence by inmates of the penal 9institution or residents of the mental health or developmental 10disabilities facility.11    (b-5) Upon the occurrence of circumstances, directly or 12indirectly attributable to COVID-19, occurring on or after 13March 9, 2020 and on or before June 30, 2021 (including the 14period between December 31, 2020 and the effective date of 15this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly) which would 16hinder the physical recovery from an injury of an eligible 17employee within the one-year period as required under 18subsection (b), the eligible employee shall be entitled to an 19extension of no longer than 60 days by which he or she shall 20continue to be paid by the employing public entity on the same 21basis as he or she was paid before the injury. The employing 22public entity may require proof of the circumstances hindering 23an eligible employee's physical recovery before granting the 24extension provided under this subsection (b-5). 25    (c) At any time during the period for which continuing 26compensation is required by this Act, the employing public   SB3076 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1entity may order at the expense of that entity physical or 2medical examinations of the injured person to determine the 3degree of disability.4    (d) During this period of disability, the injured person 5shall not be employed in any other manner, with or without 6monetary compensation. Any person who is employed in violation 7of this paragraph forfeits the continuing compensation 8provided by this Act from the time such employment begins. Any 9salary compensation due the injured person from workers' 10compensation or any salary due the injured person him from any 11type of insurance which may be carried by the employing public 12entity shall revert to that entity during the time for which 13continuing compensation is paid to the injured person him 14under this Act. Any person with a disability receiving 15compensation under the provisions of this Act shall not be 16entitled to any benefits for which the person he would qualify 17because of the person's his disability under the provisions of 18the Illinois Pension Code.19    (e) Any employee of the State of Illinois, as defined in 20Section 14-103.05 of the Illinois Pension Code, who becomes 21permanently unable to perform the duties of such employment 22due to an injury received in the active performance of the 23person's his duties as a State employee as a result of a 24willful act of violence by another employee of the State of 25Illinois, as so defined, committed during such other 26employee's course of employment and after January 1, 1988,   SB3076 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1shall be eligible for benefits pursuant to the provisions of 2this Section. For purposes of this Section, permanent 3disability is defined as a diagnosis or prognosis of an 4inability to return to current job duties by a physician 5licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches.6    (f) The compensation and other benefits provided to 7part-time employees covered by this Section shall be 8calculated based on the percentage of time the part-time 9employee was scheduled to work pursuant to the employee's his 10or her status as a part-time employee.11    (g) Pursuant to paragraphs (h) and (i) of Section 6 of 12Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, this Act 13specifically denies and limits the exercise by home rule units 14of any power which is inconsistent herewith, and all existing 15laws and ordinances which are inconsistent herewith are hereby 16superseded. This Act does not preempt the concurrent exercise 17by home rule units of powers consistent herewith.18    This Act does not apply to any home rule unit with a 19population of over 1,000,000.20    (h) In those cases where the injury to a State employee for 21which a benefit is payable under this Act was caused under 22circumstances creating a legal liability for damages on the 23part of some person other than the State employer, all of the 24rights and privileges, including the right to notice of suit 25brought against such other person and the right to commence or 26join in such suit, as given the employer, together with the   SB3076 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1conditions or obligations imposed under paragraph (b) of 2Section 5 of the Workers' Compensation Act, are also given and 3granted to the State, to the end that, with respect to State 4employees only, the State may be paid or reimbursed for the 5amount of benefit paid or to be paid by the State to the 6injured employee or the injured employee's his or her personal 7representative out of any judgment, settlement, or payment for 8such injury obtained by the such injured employee or the 9injured employee's his or her personal representative from 10such other person by virtue of the injury. 11(Source: P.A. 100-1143, eff. 1-1-19; 101-651, eff. 8-7-20; 12101-653, eff. 2-28-21.) 13    (5 ILCS 345/2)14    Sec. 2. Illness disability benefit.15    (a) As used in this Section:16    "Eligible employee" means any full-time law enforcement 17officer or full-time firefighter, including a full-time 18paramedic or a firefighter who performs paramedic duties, who 19is employed by any unit of local government, including any 20home rule unit, and any part-time or full-time county 21correctional officer or any other full or part-time employee 22of a county sheriff.23    "Illness" means any illness, disease, or condition the 24presence of which in a community results in the declaration of 25a disaster or emergency by a State, county, or municipal   SB3076 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1official.2    (b) Whenever an eligible employee suffers an illness in 3the line of duty which causes the employee to be unable to 4perform the employee's duties, the employee shall continue to 5be paid by the employing public entity on the same basis as the 6employee was paid before the illness, with no deduction from 7the employee's sick leave credits, compensatory time for 8overtime accumulations or vacation, or service credits in a 9public pension fund during the time the employee is unable to 10perform the employee's duties due to the result of the 11illness, but not longer than one year in relation to the same 12illness.13    (c) At any time during the period for which continuing 14compensation is required by this Act, the employing public 15entity may order at the expense of that entity physical or 16medical examinations of the ill person to determine the degree 17of disability.18    (d) During this period of disability, the ill person shall 19not be employed in any other manner, with or without a monetary 20compensation. Any person who is employed in violation of this 21subsection forfeits the continuing compensation provided by 22this Act from the time such employment begins. Any salary 23compensation due to the ill person from workers' compensation 24or any salary due to the employee from any type of insurance 25which may be carried by the employing public entity shall 26revert to that entity during the time for which continuing   SB3076 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17660 BDA 31091 b1compensation is paid to the employee under this Act. Any 2person with a disability receiving compensation under the 3provisions of this Act shall not be entitled to any benefits 4for which the employee would qualify because of the employee's 5disability under the provisions of the Illinois Pension Code.6    (e) Pursuant to paragraphs (h) and (i) of Section 6 of 7Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, this Act 8specifically denies and limits the exercise by home rule units 9of any power which is inconsistent herewith, and all existing 10laws and ordinances which are inconsistent herewith are hereby 11superseded. This Act does not preempt the concurrent exercise 12by home rule units of powers consistent herewith.13    This Act does not apply to any home rule unit with a 14population of over 1,000,000.15(Source: P.A. 103-63, eff. 1-1-24.)